Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-142.08
Low-speed vehicle; application
for certificate of title indicating year and make; procedure.

If a low-speed
vehicle does not have a manufacturer's vehicle identification number, the
owner of the low-speed vehicle may apply for a certificate of title by presenting
a manufacturer's statement of origin for the low-speed vehicle, a statement
that an inspection has been conducted on the low-speed vehicle, and a vehicle
identification number as described in section 60-148. The certificate of title
shall indicate the year of the low-speed vehicle as the year application for
title was made and the make of the low-speed vehicle.

Laws 2011, LB289, § 10.